Utah statutes.
63H-5-108 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Relation to certain acts.

(1)  The authority is exempt from:

(a)  Title 51, Chapter 5, Funds Consolidation Act;

(b)  Title 63A, Chapter 1, Department of Administrative Services;

(c)  Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code;

(d)  Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act; and

(e)  Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

(2)  The authority is subject to audit by the state auditor pursuant to Title 67, Chapter 3, Auditor, and by the legislative auditor general pursuant to Section 36-12-15.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 370, 2011 General Session

